Tennessee statutes. Title 17 Judges And Chancellors
Part 1

Special Judges

17-2-101. Grounds of incompetency.

No judge or chancellor shall be competent, except by consent of all parties, to sit in the following cases:

Where the judge or chancellor is interested in the event of any cause;

Where the judge or chancellor is connected with either party, by affinity or consanguinity, within the sixth degree, computing by the civil law;

Where the judge or chancellor has been of counsel in the cause;

Where the judge or chancellor has presided on the trial in an inferior court; or

In criminal cases for felony, where the person upon whom, or upon whose property, the felony has been committed, is connected with the judge or chancellor by affinity or consanguinity within the sixth degree, computing by the civil law.

Code 1858, § 3913 (deriv. Acts 1825, ch. 54, § 2; 1835-1836, ch. 68, § 1; 1843-1844, ch. 25, § 1); Shan., § 5706; Code 1932, § 9892; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-201.

Cross-References. Change of venue for incompetency, disqualification of judge, §20-4-208.

Disqualification of judge, Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 11.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Commentary under Tenn. Sup. Ct. R. 10, Canon 3(E).

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 620.

Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.11.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, §§ 18-20; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Separation of Powers — Procedure for Removal of Judge an Interference with Judicial Processes, 9 Vand. L. Rev. 88.

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189.

Comparative Legislation. Special judges and interchange:

Ala. Code §12-1-12 et seq.

Ark. Code §§16-13-103,16-15-108,16-10-117,16-13-213,16-13-405.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 26A.020.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 476.450.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 7A-45.1.

Va. Code §§ 17-7, 17-7.1.

17-2-102. Incompetency of supreme court judges.

The judges of the supreme court, within the first week of each term, or as soon thereafter as the fact comes to their knowledge, shall certify to the governor all cases upon the docket in which any of them are incompetent to sit, upon the receipt of which certificate the governor shall appoint and commission the requisite number of competent lawyers to dispose of the causes.

Code 1858, § 3919 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 68, § 1); Shan., § 5715; Code 1932, § 9901; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-202.

Cross-References. Incompetency of judges, appointment of special judges, Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 11.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Necessary Qualifications for Judgeships, 30 Tenn. L. Rev. 640.

The Constitutional Policy That Judges Be Learned in the Law (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 47 Tenn. L. Rev. 689.

The Tennessee Court System — Supreme Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 191.

Cited: Freeman v. Felts, 208 Tenn. 201, 344 S.W.2d 550, 1961 Tenn. LEXIS 412 (1961); La Fever v. Ware, 211 Tenn. 393, 365 S.W.2d 44, 1963 Tenn. LEXIS 358 (1963); Holder v. Tennessee Judicial Selection Comm'n, 937 S.W.2d 877, 1996 Tenn. LEXIS 688 (Tenn. 1996).

17-2-103. Powers of special supreme court judges.

The special judges commissioned pursuant to § 17-2-102 shall hear and determine the causes in the commission set forth, and all such other causes during the same term, and shall have the same power and authority in those causes as the regular judges of the court.

Code 1858, § 3920 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 68, § 1); Shan., § 5716; Code 1932, § 9902; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-203.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Supreme Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 191.

17-2-104. Sickness of judges of supreme court.

In case of the sickness of any one (1) or more of the judges of the supreme court, the governor shall have the power to commission persons learned in law to fill the vacancy during the illness of the judge or judges.

Acts 1868-1869, ch. 28, § 3; 1895, ch. 76, § 7; Shan., § 5725; mod. Code 1932, § 9914; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-204.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Supreme Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 191.

Cited: La Fever v. Ware, 211 Tenn. 393, 365 S.W.2d 44, 1963 Tenn. LEXIS 358 (1963); Hooker v. Haslam, 393 S.W.3d 156, 2012 Tenn. LEXIS 719 (Tenn. July 27, 2012).

17-2-105. Special judges for appellate courts.

In case of the incompetency, sickness or other disability of any judge of the court of appeals or court of criminal appeals, the governor shall have the power to commission a person to fill the vacancy during the incompetency, sickness or other disability of the judge, and the person so appointed shall be paid the same salary for the time served and receive the same expense allowance as that allowed the regular judge.

Acts 1895, ch. 76, § 7; Shan., § 6317; mod. Code 1932, § 10610; Acts 1961, ch. 231, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1967, ch. 226, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-205.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, § 25.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Court of Appeals (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 219.

17-2-106. Compensation of special supreme court judge.

Special judges of the supreme court shall in all cases be paid the same salary for the time served and receive the same expense allowance as are allowed the regular judges.

Code 1858, § 3930 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 68, § 2); Acts 1895, ch. 76, § 7; Shan., § 5729; mod. Code 1932, § 9918; Acts 1961, ch. 231, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-206.

Collateral References. Judges
22(8).

17-2-107. General sessions judges.

The provisions of this chapter in relation to the incompetency of judges and chancellors, and to the disposition of causes in which they are incompetent, shall equally apply to judges of the courts of general sessions, and the judges may interchange with each other when necessary for the dispatch of business.

Code 1858, § 3925; Shan., § 5722; Code 1932, § 9908; modified; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-213.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 5.

17-2-108. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §17-2-108 (Code 1858, § 3921 (deriv. Acts 1857-1858, ch. 90, § 1); Shan., § 5717; Code 1932, § 9903; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-214), concerning special judge or chancellor by consent, was repealed by Acts 1997, ch. 473, § 4.

17-2-109. Special judge by judicial appointments.

Whenever litigation in any chancery, circuit, criminal, general sessions, juvenile, probate or appellate court of this state becomes congested or delay in the disposition of litigation becomes imminent for any reason, the chief justice of the supreme court shall assign a retired or regular chancellor or judge to assist in the removal of the congestion or delay; provided, that the assignment shall not materially interfere with the performance of the assigned chancellor's or judge's official duties. In such situation both chancellors or judges may hear, try and dispose of litigation in such court at the same time, both signing their respective minutes.

Whenever litigation in any chancery or circuit court of this state becomes congested, or whenever litigation in any chancery or circuit court has required the recusal of a chancellor or judge, or whenever delay in the disposition of litigation becomes imminent for any reason, the chief justice of the supreme court may assign a former chancellor or judge to assist in the removal of the congestion or delay.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), any chancellor or judge has the discretion to request another chancellor or judge to assist in the removal of congestion or delay if the original chancellor or judge becomes aware of the need for assistance before the supreme court makes the assignment; and, in such situation, both the requesting chancellor or judge and the requested chancellor and judge may hear, try and dispose of litigation in such court at the same time, both signing their respective minutes.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to interfere with the appointment of special chancellors or judges as provided elsewhere by statute.

Acts 1949, ch. 278; § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 9945.7 (Williams, § 9923.1); Acts 1963, ch. 87, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-215; Acts 1987, ch. 65, § 1; 1995, ch. 236, § 1; 1997, ch. 473, § 5; 1999, ch. 23, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.12.

Cited: La Fever v. Ware, 211 Tenn. 393, 365 S.W.2d 44, 1963 Tenn. LEXIS 358 (1963); Leighton v. Henderson, 220 Tenn. 91, 414 S.W.2d 419, 1967 Tenn. LEXIS 392 (1967); State v. Brown, 644 S.W.2d 418, 1982 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 398 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1982); Dupuis v. Hand, 814 S.W.2d 340, 1991 Tenn. LEXIS 168 (Tenn. 1991); In re Valle, 31 S.W.3d 566, 2000 Tenn. App. LEXIS 107 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2000).

17-2-110. Special judge assigned by chief justice upon certification.

When any chancellor or circuit, criminal or appellate judge is, for any reason, unable to try the docket in any court of the chancellor's or judge's division or circuit, the chancellor or judge shall certify to the chief justice of the supreme court the fact of the inability, with a request that the chief justice assign some other chancellor, circuit, criminal or appellate judge to hear the case or cases that the chancellor or judge is unable to hear and decide.

It is the duty of the chief justice to designate some other chancellor or circuit or criminal judge who is not or will not be engaged in hearing causes in that chancellor's or judge's own division or circuit to repair to the place where the case or cases mentioned in subsection (a) are to be heard, and hear and decide the case or cases in all respects as if the chancellor or judge were the duly elected judge of that division or circuit.

It shall be no objection to the authority of the assigned chancellor or judge that the regular chancellor or judge is engaged in the hearing of causes in the same or another county of the same division or circuit.

Acts 1919, ch. 166, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 5917a3; Code 1932, § 9929; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-216; Acts 1987, ch. 65, § 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.12.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Supreme Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 191.

Cited: Bedford County Hospital v. County of Bedford, 42 Tenn. App. 569, 304 S.W.2d 697, 1957 Tenn. App. LEXIS 98 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1957); Leighton v. Henderson, 220 Tenn. 91, 414 S.W.2d 419, 1967 Tenn. LEXIS 392 (1967); Dupuis v. Hand, 814 S.W.2d 340, 1991 Tenn. LEXIS 168 (Tenn. 1991); Maxwell Med., Inc. v. Chumley, 282 S.W.3d 893, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 542 (Tenn. Ct. App. Sept. 22, 2008); Hooker v. Haslam, 393 S.W.3d 156, 2012 Tenn. LEXIS 719 (Tenn. July 27, 2012).

17-2-111. Expenses of assigned judge or chancellor.

The expenses of the chancellor, judge or appellate judge who serves as assigned by the chief justice under §17-2-109 or §17-2-110, or the retired judge designated or assigned in accordance with §16-3-502(2), shall be certified by the chancellor, judge, appellate judge or retired judge pursuant to policies and guidelines promulgated by the supreme court. The expenses shall be paid in addition to the regular salary of the judge.

Acts 1919, ch. 166, § 2; Shan Supp., § 5917a4; mod. Code 1932, § 9930; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 24; modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-217; Acts 1987, ch. 65, § 3; 1993, ch. 196, § 3.

17-2-112. Transfers from chancery to circuit court because of incompetency.

When any chancellor is incompetent to try any cause in the court for which the chancellor is responsible, a circuit judge may hear and determine the cause as chancellor, for which purpose the clerk of the chancery court shall bring before the chancellor all the papers in the cause, and the necessary entries shall be made on the minutes of the chancery court, and signed by the circuit judge presiding.

Code 1858, § 3922 (deriv. Acts 1843-1844, ch. 126, § 1); Shan., § 5718; Code 1932, § 9904; T.C.A. (orig. ed), § 17-218; Acts 2012, ch. 789, § 4.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment substituted “a circuit judge may hear and determine the cause as chancellor” for “the chancellor may notify any one (1) of the circuit judges, whose duty it shall be at the next term of the circuit court of the county in which the incompetency exists, and while holding the court, to hear and determine the cause as chancellor”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 789, § 7. April 23, 2012.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 621.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

Cited: Gordonsville Milling Co. v. Jones, 57 S.W. 630, 1900 Tenn. Ch. App. LEXIS 45 (1900).

17-2-113. Circuit judge acting as chancellor.

Any circuit judge may also during the sittings of a chancery court, upon notification of a cause in which the chancellor is incompetent, as provided in §17-2-112, take the place of the chancellor on the bench and hear and determine the cause as chancellor, the necessary entry being made on the minutes of the court and signed by the circuit judge.

Code 1858, § 3923 (deriv. Acts 1843-1844, ch. 126, § 1; 1855-1856, ch. 24); Shan., § 5719; Code 1932, § 9905; T.C.A. (orig. ed.) § 17-219.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

17-2-114. [Obsolete.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former §17-2-114 (Code 1858, § 3926 (deriv. Acts 1857-1858, ch. 90, § 2); Shan., § 5723; mod. Code 1932, § 9909; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 36, T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-220) was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 1993.

17-2-115. Certification of incompetency to governor.

When any judge of any circuit court, criminal court, or chancellor, or judge or chancellor of any special court of equal dignity with circuit or chancery court, certifies to the governor that the judge or chancellor is incompetent to hold the judge's or chancellor's court, or to try any cause or causes pending in the judge's or chancellor's court, the governor shall appoint some person learned in the law and constitutionally qualified to discharge the duties of the office of judge or chancellor, to hold the court or try the cause or causes.

Acts 1871, ch. 128, § 4; Shan., § 5734; Code 1932, § 9923; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-221.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.12.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Necessary Qualifications for Judgeships, 30 Tenn. L. Rev. 640.

The Constitutional Policy That Judges Be Learned in the Law (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 47 Tenn. L. Rev. 689.

Cited: La Fever v. Ware, 211 Tenn. 393, 365 S.W.2d 44, 1963 Tenn. LEXIS 358 (1963); Leighton v. Henderson, 220 Tenn. 91, 414 S.W.2d 419, 1967 Tenn. LEXIS 392 (1967).

17-2-116. Disability of judges or chancellors.

When any of the judges of the circuit courts, criminal courts, other special courts or courts of general sessions, or any of the chancellors, is unable from sickness or other physical disability to attend and hold any of the courts at the time and place required by law, the governor shall appoint and commission a special judge who shall have the same qualifications as the regular judge to attend and hold such courts for and during the absence or disability of any such judges.

If a judge or chancellor does not certify the disability to the governor, and the chief justice of the supreme court determines that the judge or chancellor has been and is so disabled as to prevent the judge or chancellor from carrying out the responsibilities and duties of the judge's or chancellor's office for a period of ninety (90) days or more, then the chief justice shall have the authority to certify the disability to the governor. The governor shall appoint and commission a special judge who shall have the same qualifications as the regular judge or chancellor to attend and hold court during the period of disability of any such judge or chancellor. The special judge shall serve until the chief justice certifies to the governor that the judge or chancellor is no longer disabled.

In the event a judge or chancellor who is certified as disabled pursuant to this section subsequently dies or retires, any special judge or chancellor serving for the deceased or retired judge shall continue to serve until such time as the successor of the deceased or retired judge or chancellor is duly elected, qualified and installed in office in the manner provided by law, and may be a candidate for this office in the election.

Code 1858, § 3927 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 68, §§ 1, 3); Shan., § 5724; Code 1932, § 9913; Acts 1941, ch. 28, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 9913; Acts 1959, ch. 150, § 1; 1972, ch. 532, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 36; T.C.A., (orig. ed.), § 17-222; Acts 1989, ch. 153, §§ 1, 2.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 622.

Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.12.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Necessary Qualifications for Judgeships, 30 Tenn. L. Rev. 640.

The Constitutional Policy That Judges Be Learned in the Law (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 47 Tenn. L. Rev. 689.

Attorney General Opinions. Effect of death of disabled judge on service of special judge, OAG 97-116 (9/02/97).

Cited: Bedford County Hospital v. County of Bedford, 42 Tenn. App. 569, 304 S.W.2d 697, 1957 Tenn. App. LEXIS 98 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1957); La Fever v. Ware, 211 Tenn. 393, 365 S.W.2d 44, 1963 Tenn. LEXIS 358 (1963); State v. Daniel, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 834 (Tenn. Crim. App. Oct. 30, 2006).

17-2-117. Powers of special judges or chancellors.

The person appointed and commissioned pursuant to § 17-2-116 shall have all the power and authority of the regular judge or chancellor in whose place the person is appointed, shall draw the same salary, have the same emoluments of office and shall continue to hold the courts and exercise the duties of the office, including the power to appoint a secretary at the same salary and under the same provisions as the regular judge or chancellor may have, which shall be in lieu of the secretarial help to which the regular judge or chancellor is entitled, until the regular judge recovers from the sickness or disability and appears on the first day of the term for the purposes of resuming the functions of judge or chancellor.

Nothing in subsection (a) shall be construed to empower the special chancellor to appoint the clerks and masters of the chancery courts, which appointive power shall remain with the regular chancellor.

Code 1858, § 3928 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 68, §§ 1, 3); Shan., § 5726; Code 1932, § 9915; Acts 1959, ch. 150, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-223.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, § 2.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Cited: Bedford County Hospital v. County of Bedford, 42 Tenn. App. 569, 304 S.W.2d 697, 1957 Tenn. App. LEXIS 98 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1957).

17-2-118. Substitute judges.

If, for good cause, including, but not limited to, by reason of illness, physical incapacitation, vacation or absence from the city or judicial district on a matter related to the judge's judicial office, the judge of a state or county trial court of record is unable to hold court, the judge shall appoint a substitute judge to hold court, preside and adjudicate.

A substitute judge shall possess all of the qualifications of a judge of the court in which the substitute is appointed.

No substitute judge may be appointed for a period of more than three (3) days; provided, that the judge appointed pursuant to this section may finish any trial that is commenced during the period of appointment.

A substitute judge appointed pursuant to this section shall have no authority to award fees except those that are statutory.

A substitute judge shall not preside over a cause without a consent form signed by all litigants who are present at the beginning of the proceeding. The consent form shall plainly state that the substitute judge has not been duly elected by the citizens of the judicial district or appointed by the governor but has been appointed pursuant to this section. Further, the consent form shall include the name of the lawyer appointed as substitute judge, the judge of the court in which the substitute judge is sitting, the date for which the substitute judge was appointed and the reason for the regular judge's absence. The consent form shall be transmitted and maintained on file for public inspection at the administrative office of the courts in Nashville.

Subsections (a)-(e) shall not apply where a judge finds it necessary to be absent from holding court and appoints as a substitute judge:

A duly elected or appointed judge of any inferior court; or

A full-time officer of the judicial system under the judge's supervision whose duty it is to perform judicial functions, such as a juvenile magistrate, a child support magistrate or clerk and master, who is a licensed attorney in good standing with the Tennessee supreme court. The judicial officer shall only serve as special judge in matters related to that officer's duties as a judicial officer.

Notwithstanding subsections (a)-(e), a judge shall have the authority to appoint a substitute judge as provided in subdivision (f)(1).

Acts 1870, ch. 78, §§ 1, 3, 4; Shan., §§ 5730, 5732; mod. Code 1932, §§ 9919, 9921; T.C.A., (orig. ed.), § 17-225; modified; Acts 1996, ch. 943, § 1; 1999, ch. 23, § 2; 2009, ch. 235, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 235, § 1 directed the code commission to change all references from “child support referee” to “child support magistrate” and all references from “juvenile referee” to “juvenile magistrate” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “child support magistrate” for “child support referee” and “juvenile magistrate” for “juvenile referee” in (f)(1)(B).

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 235, § 2. May 20, 2009.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Tenn. Sup. Ct. R. 11, § VII.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 623.

Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.12.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, §§ 22, 24.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Necessary Qualifications for Judgeships, 30 Tenn. L. Rev. 640.

Attorney General Opinions. Supreme Court has no authority to prohibit use of special judges, OAG 96-127 (11/12/96).

Application of limitations to retired judge, OAG 97-113 (8/14/97).

Consent form requirement not applicable to retired judge assigned under §8-36-806, OAG 97-113 (8/14/97).

Compensation for clerk and master serving as substitute judge not authorized, OAG 99-087 (4/8/99).

Cited: Moore v. Love, 171 Tenn. 682, 107 S.W.2d 982, 1936 Tenn. LEXIS 101 (1937); La Fever v. Ware, 211 Tenn. 393, 365 S.W.2d 44, 1963 Tenn. LEXIS 358 (1963); State ex rel. Anglin v. Mitchell, 596 S.W.2d 779, 1980 Tenn. LEXIS 415 (Tenn. 1980); In re Valle, 31 S.W.3d 566, 2000 Tenn. App. LEXIS 107 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2000); Dep't of Children's Servs. v. Sails (In re M.A.P.), — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 431 (Tenn. Ct. App. July 10, 2009); State ex rel. Creighton v. Foster, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. App. LEXIS 173 (Tenn. Ct. App. Apr. 7, 2011).

17-2-119. Contested elections — Temporary judge.

The governor shall appoint a temporary judge, chancellor or district attorney general in all cases where a contest arises in the election of any of those officers, and they shall hold the offices, and have all the powers and jurisdiction pertaining to the offices, until the contest is judicially determined and the regularly elected officers are duly qualified and commissioned; and they are clothed with the same power, and shall receive the same compensation, as is allowed the officer in other cases, to be paid out of the state treasury upon a warrant of the commissioner of finance and administration.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 73; Shan., § 5733; Code 1932, § 9922; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 24; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-226; modified.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 623.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, §§ 12, 22; 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Officers, § 5.

17-2-120. Oath of special judge.

Every special judge, before entering on the duties of the judge's appointment, shall take an oath before the clerk of the court to support the constitution of the United States and the constitution of Tennessee, and also the following oath of office: “I, A B, solemnly swear that I will administer justice without respect to persons, and do equal rights to the poor and the rich, and that I will faithfully and impartially discharge all the duties incumbent upon me as a judge to the best of my abilities.”

Acts 1870, ch. 78, § 2; Shan., § 5731; Code 1932, § 9920; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-227.

Cross-References. Oaths of judges in general, §17-1-104.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Tenn. Sup. Ct. R. 11, § VII.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, §§ 22, 24.

17-2-121. Retired or former judges in certain civil cases — Courtrooms — Process — Manner of trial.

If the trial of a civil case is expected to be complex, lengthy or the litigants, for any reason, desire the matter to be disposed of in an expeditious manner, the litigants may, upon joint motion of all parties to the action and with the consent of the appropriate judge, agree to employ a retired or former judge to hear the case.

The administrative director of the courts shall compile a list of all retired or former Tennessee trial level judges who are willing to sit in special cases pursuant to subsection (a) and the particular expertise of each judge, if any. Upon compiling the list, the administrative director of the courts shall distribute the list to every active trial level judge with civil jurisdiction in this state.

When the litigants in a civil case agree to employ a retired or former judge pursuant to subsection (a), they shall approach the judge to whom the case was originally assigned. Upon explaining the nature of the litigation, the judge shall give the parties the names of three (3) retired or former judges available to hear the case. If three (3) retired or former judges are not available, the judge shall give them the names of the judges who are available. Where possible, the judge shall match the expertise of the retired or former judge to the particular case in question.

It shall be the duty of the litigants to decide which retired or former judge to contact, contact the judge, and make all necessary arrangements for the place, date and time of the trial. It shall also be the responsibility of the litigants to compensate the retired or former judge in accordance with § 17-2-106. The clerks and other courthouse officials shall cooperate in helping the litigants find a suitable courtroom for the trial of the case. If no courtroom is available, the case may be tried in any location agreeable to the litigants and retired or former judge.

Process, subpoenas and all other matters relating to the trial of the case shall be governed by the Tennessee rules of civil procedure. The case shall be tried without a jury and in the same manner as other civil cases.

Upon the conclusion of the trial, the retired or former judge shall submit the judge's finding to the judge of the court to which the case was originally assigned. The finding of the retired or former judge shall become the finding of the court and judgment may be entered thereon in the same manner as if the case had been tried by that court. The finding of the retired or former judge and the judgment of the court may be appealed in the same manner as in any other civil case and shall be governed by the Tennessee rules of appellate procedure.

Acts 1984, ch. 894, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, § 31.

17-2-122. Failure of judge to attend — Selection of special judge.

Notwithstanding § 16-15-209 or § 17-2-109 or any other relevant provision to the contrary, a judge shall have the authority to appoint a special judge as provided in this section.

Sections 16-15-209 and 17-2-109 and any other relevant provision shall not apply where a judge finds it necessary to be absent from holding court and appoints as a substitute judge an officer of the judicial system under the judge's supervision whose duty it is to perform judicial functions, such as a juvenile magistrate, a child support magistrate or clerk and master, who is a licensed attorney in good standing with the Tennessee supreme court. The judicial officer shall only serve as special judge in matters related to their duties as judicial officer.

Acts 1997, ch. 473, § 6; 2009, ch. 235, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 235, § 1 directed the code commission to change all references from “child support referee” to “child support magistrate” and all references from “juvenile referee” to “juvenile magistrate” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “child support magistrate” for “child support referee” and “juvenile magistrate” for “juvenile referee” in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 235, § 2. May 20, 2009.

Attorney General Opinions. Compensation for clerk and master serving as substitute judge not authorized, OAG 99-087 (4/8/99).

Cited: Fye v. Kennedy, 991 S.W.2d 754, 1998 Tenn. App. LEXIS 411 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1998); State Dep't of Children's Servs. v. A.M.H., 198 S.W.3d 757, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 156 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2006); Dep't of Children's Servs. v. Sails (In re M.A.P.), — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 431 (Tenn. Ct. App. July 10, 2009); Wolfe v. Duckhorn (in re J.G.H.), — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 551 (Tenn. Ct. App. Aug. 17, 2009).

17-2-123. Full-time master in certain counties.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, in any county having a metropolitan form of government and having a population of more than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court judges of such county may appoint a full-time master to serve as a judicial officer in the absence of any such judges.

A master appointed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) shall be an attorney licensed to practice law by this state and in good standing with the board of professional responsibility.

The compensation for a master appointed pursuant to this section shall be fixed by the presiding judge of the judicial district and shall be paid from any fund appropriated for such purpose by the county governing body.

The master shall have all the powers specified in § 17-2-118 and the powers granted to masters by Tenn. R. Civ. P. 53.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, in any county having a metropolitan form of government and a population of more than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the circuit courts exercising domestic or probate jurisdiction may appoint one (1) or more suitable persons to act as masters at the pleasure of the judge. A master shall be a member of the bar in good standing and shall hold office at the pleasure of the judge. The compensation of a master shall be fixed by the judge with approval of the county legislative body or the pertinent governing body, and paid from public funds.

Provided the respective circuit court has jurisdiction in the manner provided for the hearing of cases by the court, the judge or judges for whom the master serves may direct that the master hear in the first instance the following types of cases:

Orders of protection (both hearings and reviews);

Motions to amend or alter orders of protection;

Child support petitions;

Signing appearance orders for child support cases;

Signing and hearing show cause orders for temporary support and parenting time;

Signing attachment orders; and

Temporary parenting plans.

A master has the same authority as the judge to issue any and all process necessary in the types of cases the master is authorized by subdivision (b)(2) to hear. The master in the conduct of authorized proceedings has the powers of a trial judge.

Upon the conclusion of the hearing in each case, the master shall transmit to the judge all papers relating to the case, together with the master's findings and recommendations in writing.

Any party may, within five (5) days thereafter, excluding nonjudicial days, file a request with the court for hearing by the appropriate circuit court judge. The judge may, on the judge's own motion, order a rehearing of any matter heard before a master, and shall allow a hearing if a request for such hearing is filed as herein prescribed. Unless the judge orders otherwise, the order of the master shall be the decree of the court pending a rehearing.

Any appeal from the master to the judge from a final order shall be tried de novo by the judge.

In case no hearing of a final order before the judge is requested, or when the right to a hearing is waived, the findings and recommendations of the master become the decree of the court when confirmed by an order of the judge. The final order of the court is, in any event, proof of such confirmation, and also of the fact that the matter was duly referred to the master.

Acts 1998, ch. 880, § 1; 2010, ch. 845, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment redesignated former (a)-(d) as present (a)(1)-(4), respectively; substituted “subdivision (a)(1)” for “subsection (a)” in (a)(2); and added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 845, § 2. April 30, 2010.